Utah statutes.
10-8-14.   Water, sewer, gas, electricity, and public transportation -- Service beyond city limits -- Retainage -- Cable television and public telecommunications services.

(1) A city may:

(a)  construct, maintain, and operate waterworks, sewer collection, sewer treatment systems, gas works, electric light works, telecommunications lines, cable television lines, or public transportation systems;

(b)  authorize the construction, maintenance and operation of the works or systems listed in Subsection (1)(a) by others;

(c)  purchase or lease the works or systems listed in Subsection (1)(a) from any person or corporation; and

(d)  sell and deliver the surplus product or service capacity of any works or system listed in Subsection (1)(a), not required by the city or the city's inhabitants, to others beyond the limits of the city, except the sale and delivery of cable television services or public telecommunications services is governed by Subsection (3).

(2)  If any payment on a contract with a private person, firm, or corporation to construct waterworks, sewer collection, sewer treatment systems, gas works, electric light works, telecommunications lines, cable television lines, or public transportation systems is retained or withheld, it shall be retained or withheld and released as provided in Section 13-8-5.

(3)  A city's actions under this section related to works or systems involving public telecommunications services or cable television services are subject to the requirements of Chapter 18, Municipal Cable Television and Public Telecommunications Services Act.



Amended by Chapter 83, 2001 General Session

